Massachusetts, session 194th, H2397.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 75 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 36E the following section: –
Section 36F. There shall be at the University of Massachusetts medical school in
Worcester a nursing workforce center, formerly known as the Nursing Council on Workforce
Sustainability, herein the Nursing Workforce Center. The purpose of the Center shall be to gather
data, research, provide analysis to advise policy leaders on how to address the current and future
nursing workforce needs of nurses and others who support nursing care, and provide
recommendations to advance nursing science and practice in the commonwealth. The Center
shall be administered by an executive director who shall be appointed by the dean of the
University of Massachusetts medical school. The Center shall be subject to the direction and
oversight of the executive office of health and human Services.
The Center shall:
of 3

(a) Convene a diverse group of key stakeholders including nurses, health care
providers, business and industry leaders, consumers, state agencies, legislators and educators to
collaborate on strategies to improve the nursing workforce and speak with one voice on issues
impacting the nursing workforce.
(b) Conduct research on best practices and quality patient outcomes across settings.
(c) Prepare and disseminate written reports and recommendations regarding the current and
future status and trends of the nursing workforce.
(d) Research, analyze and report data related to the recruitment and retention of the
nursing workforce.
(e) Develop and implement strategies to recruit and retain nurses in the
commonwealth.
(f) Recommend systemic changes to the nursing workforce pipeline.
(g) Disseminate the results of the reviews and make recommendations to the joint
committee on public health, the joint committee on higher education, the house and senate
committee on ways and means, the department of public health, health care stakeholders,
consumers and other interested parties.
(h) Foster collaboration among members of the health care community to achieve
policy consensus, promote diversity across the profession and within the health care workforce,
and enhance the knowledge of nursing practice.
of 3

(i) Encourage initiatives to support nursing excellence through innovative strategies
such as recognition programs, incentives for professional growth, and activities that enhance the
visibility and positive perception of the nursing profession across the commonwealth.
(j) Prepare and disseminate an annual report on the state of the nursing workforce in
the commonwealth and the work of the Center.
(k) Provide consultation, technical assistance and information related to nursing
resources within and outside of the commonwealth and serve as a clearinghouse on nursing
practice and nursing workforce data.
(l) Examine and engage in other matters deemed appropriate by the executive office
of health and human services.
of 3